Washington statutes.
RCW 36.70.200

Board of adjustment—Creation—Zoning adjustor.

Whenever a board shall have created a planning agency, it shall also by ordinance, coincident with the enactment of a zoning ordinance, create a board of adjustment, and may establish the office of zoning adjustor: PROVIDED, That any county that has prior to June 10, 1959, enacted a zoning ordinance, shall, within ninety days thereof, create a board of adjustment.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.70.200. Prior: 1959 c 201 s 20.]